dictionaries/da_DK/da_DK.dic
af-/81,32
afdampe/1,21,22,79,39
afjogge/1,21,22,79,39
afnakke/1,21,22,79,39
afsløre/1,21,22,79,39
aftenkursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
afværge/1,21,22,79,39,31
alt-/81,32
ånde/1,21,22,79,39,31
åndevæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
angiven/12,82,10,39
antiparkinson-/81,32
aphelium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
appropriere/1,21,22,79,39
asen/10,4,11,87,43,39,31
atomdreven/12,82,10,39
atrium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
auto-/81,32
automobilmuseum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
badelagen/10,4,11,87,43,39,31
bagtale/20,21,22,79,39
bankvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
batteridreven/12,82,10,39
befolke/1,21,22,79,39
begravelsesvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
belysningsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
bemøje/1,21,22,79,39
bestræbe/20,21,22,79,39
biblioteksvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
billed-/81,32
biogasdreven/12,82,10,39
bjerge/1,21,22,79,39
bortfløjen/12,82,10,39
bortløben/12,82,10,39
brandvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
brevkursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
brokke/1,21,22,79,39
bukse-/81,32
bunden/12,82,10,39
byjubilæum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
caldarium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
charmekursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
co-/81,32
cracke/1,21,22,79,39
cyathium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
dansk-/81,32
datadreven/12,82,10,39
delirium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
desavouere/1,21,22,79,39
detail-/81,32
direktivbunden/12,82,10,39
dobbeltvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
drifts-/81,32
drukne/1,21,22,79,39,31
DSU-kursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
døgnvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
døvbleven/12,82,10,39
efterretningsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
efteruddannelseskursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
eks-/81,32
eksaminatorium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
eksilere/1,21,22,79,39
endocardium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69 al:endocardii al:endocardia al:endocardiorum
éngangs-/81,32
enkeltfagskursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
epitafium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
etno-/81,32
fabelvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
fangen/12,82,10,39 al:fangent al:fangents
fantasere/1,21,22,79,39
farvespektrum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
fattigvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
fem-/81,32
filmmuseum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
filmovertrukken/12,82,10,39
fintreven/12,82,10,39
firehjulstrukken/12,82,10,39
flapre/1,21,22,79,39
floromvunden/12,82,10,39
flymuseum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
flyvevæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
fod-/81,32
forberedelseskursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
forekommen/12,82,10,39
forgifte/1,21,22,79,39
forhånds-/81,32
forsende/20,21,22,79,39
forstvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
fortsættelseskursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
forvreden/12,82,10,39
fosforescere/1,21,22,79,39
franskkursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
freds-/81,32
frigiven/12,82,10,39
friluftsmuseum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
friskreven/12,82,10,39
fylde/20,21,22,79,39
fyrvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
fælles-/81,32
gametangium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
gasdreven/12,82,10,39
gastroentero-/81,32
gennemillustrere/1,21,22,79,39
gentagen/12,82,10,39 al:gentagede al:gentagedes
glosarium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85
glosere/1,21,22,79,39
gren-/81,32
groftreven/12,82,10,39
grovskåren/12,82,10,39
grundkursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
gummilagen/10,4,11,87,43,39,31
gældbunden/12,82,10,39
håndrulle/1,21,22,79,39
håndskreven/12,82,10,39
håndværker-/81,32
hankønsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
harmonium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85
havnevæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
hd-studium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
hem-/81,32
hestetrukken/12,82,10,39
HF-kursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
histo-/81,32
hjælpeverbum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85
hore/1,21,22,79,39,31
hospitalsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
hunde-/81,32
hypo-/81,32
hypokondrium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
højtbesungen/12,82,10,39
hør-/81,32
ihukommen/12,82,10,39
importere/1,21,22,79,39
imødekommen/12,82,10,39
indkommen/12,82,10,39
indrykke/1,21,22,79,39
insektbåren/12,82,10,39
intelligensvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
interludium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
interregnum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85
introducere/1,21,22,79,39
introkursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
ituskåren/12,82,10,39
jernbanemuseum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
jubilæum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
justervæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
kalendarium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
kalve-/81,32
kastevæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
kateterisere/1,21,22,79,39
kenotafium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85
klitvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
knald-/81,32
kobberstukken/12,82,10,39
koeksistere/1,21,22,79,39
kolumbarium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85
koncilium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
kor-/81,32
krabbe/1,21,22,79,39
kron-/81,32
kunstindustrimuseum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
kvadrat-/81,32
kvindemuseum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
kæle/1,21,22,79,39,31
købmands-/81,32
lagen/10,4,11,87,43,39,31
landbo-/81,32
lavsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
legetøjs-/81,32
lensvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
liglagen/10,4,11,87,43,39,31
lokalmuseum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
longere/1,21,22,79,39
lovbunden/12,82,10,39
luft-/81,32
luftfartsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
lufthavnsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
mad-/81,32
maskindreven/12,82,10,39
maskulinisere/1,21,22,79,39
masse-/81,32
mausoleum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
medtagen/12,82,10,39
menings-/81,32
menneskevæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
metrum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
midt-/81,32
mod-/81,32
molestere/1,21,22,79,39
motordreven/12,82,10,39
multiplum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85
myometrium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69 al:myometrii al:myometria al:myometriorum
møde-/81,32
møntvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
naturbunden/12,82,10,39
naturvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
nedkommen/12,82,10,39
nedruste/1,21,22,79,39
nedtrukken/12,82,10,39
neuro-/81,32
nul-/81,32
nyfalden/12,82,10,39
nystrøgen/12,82,10,39
nyudkommen/12,82,10,39
oktober-/81,32
oktrojere/1,21,22,79,39
omnium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
omskåren/12,82,10,39
opbygnings-/81,32
opfylde/20,21,22,79,39
opkommen/12,82,10,39
optrævle/1,21,22,79,39
ordensvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
ostium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69 al:ostii al:ostia al:ostiorum
overkommen/12,82,10,39
overlagen/10,4,11,87,43,39,31
oversigte/1,21,22,79,39
påløben/12,82,10,39
panser-/81,32
parkvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
participium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
passiare/1,21,22,79,39
patient-/81,32
pige-/81,32
plakatmuseum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
plotte/1,21,22,79,39
postvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
produktions-/81,32
proscenium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
præferere/1,21,22,79,39
re-/81,32
reassurere/1,21,22,79,39
redningsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
regnskabsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
relikvarium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
renovationsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
retrahere/1,21,22,79,39
retsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29 ph:restvæsen
rigs-/81,32
rumvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
rundskåren/12,82,10,39
ruskursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
sameksistere/1,21,22,79,39
samfunds-/81,32
selvfinansiere/1,21,22,79,39
selvopfunden/12,82,10,39
sex-/81,32
silkelagen/10,4,11,87,43,39,31
skattevæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
skolevæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
skov-/81,32
skovvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
skraldgrine/1,21,22,79,39
skuffedarium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
sløse/1,21,22,79,39
smugrøgen/12,82,10,39
social-/81,32
spande/1,21,22,79,39
sporangium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
springlagen/10,4,11,87,43,39,31
sprog-/81,32
stedbunden/12,82,10,39
steppe/1,21,22,79,39
stor-/81,32
stræklagen/10,4,11,87,43,39,31
studenterjubilæum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
sundhedsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
sunken/12,82,10,39
supervisere/1,21,22,79,39
sygehusvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
synedrium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
søster-/81,32
søvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
teatermuseum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
teatralisere/1,21,22,79,39
telefonvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
telegrafvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
tilbagebleven/12,82,10,39
tiloversbleven/12,82,10,39
tilsmudse/1,21,22,79,39
tin-/81,32
toldvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
triple/1,21,22,79,39
tvangsudskreven/12,82,10,39
tysk-/81,32
ubeskreven/12,82,10,39
udbasunere/1,21,22,79,39
udpønse/1,21,22,79,39
udskåren/12,82,10,39
ugekursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
underdimensionere/1,21,22,79,39
undergiven/12,82,10,39
underlagen/10,4,11,87,43,39,31
undervisningsvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
universal-/81,32
uskreven/12,82,10,39
vådliggerlagen/10,4,11,87,43,39,31
vagervæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
vandvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
vedtagen/12,82,10,39
vejvæsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
vetoe/1,21,22,79,39
viderekommen/12,82,10,39
vokabularium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
væg-/81,32
væsen/10,4,11,87,43,39,29
ærgre/1,21,22,79,39
ø-/81,32
